Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.320

Abandonment—Effect.

If a majority of votes cast at the special election favor the abandonment of the council-manager form of government, the officers elected at the next succeeding biennial election shall be those then prescribed for cities or towns of like class. Upon the qualification of such officers, the municipality shall again become organized under the general laws of the state, but such change shall not affect in any manner or degree the property, rights, or liabilities of the corporation but shall merely extend to such change in its form of government.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.18.320. Prior: 1943 c 271 s 23, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-32, part.]